Massachusetts, session 194th, H1113.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 162 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
Whoever, for compensation, not being an attorney at law acting in the usual course of his
profession, directly or indirectly solicits from an insured, or the representative of the insured, or
performs services pursuant to an agreement, assignment, engagement, or undertaking either to
represent the insured or to act as the assignee of the insured in connection with the assessment of
damages, negotiation, settlement, appraisal or reference of a loss under a fire insurance policy,
homeowners insurance policy, commercial multi-peril insurance policy, business interruption
insurance policy, fidelity bond or crime insurance policy, inland or ocean marine insurance
policy, or other property damage insurance coverage of any sort, shall be a public insurance
adjuster.
of 1